District of Columbia statutes.
51-120

Disposition of fines.

The amount of all fines collected pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter shall be turned over to the Director and by the Director paid into the District Unemployment Fund.

Aug. 28, 1935, 49 Stat. 956, ch. 794, § 19
renumbered § 20, June 4, 1943, 57 Stat. 124, ch. 117, § 1
Sept. 24, 1993, D.C. Law 10-15, § 218, 40 DCR 5420
1981 Ed., § 46-121.
1973 Ed., § 46-320.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 218 of District of Columbia Unemployment Compensation Comprehensive Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-260, March 27, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 2330).